Colorado, session 2025B, HB25B-1001.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The continuation of the qualified business income (QBI)
deduction add-back is a continuation of existing tax policy;
(b) In 2020, the general assembly enacted House Bill 20-1420,
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

which included a provision that required certain taxpayers to add to their
federal taxable income an amount equal to their federal QBI deduction for
purposes of determining their state taxable income;
(c) The provision initially applied to income tax years 2021 and
2022 and was later extended to apply to income tax years 2023 to 2025;
(d) This corresponding, permanent continuation of the QBI
deduction add-back is a continuation of existing tax policy and is not a "tax
policy change" under section 20 (4)(a) of article X of the Colorado
constitution; and
(e) The continuation of the QBI deduction add-back will not cause
any "net revenue gain" to the state under section 20 (4)(a) of article X of the
Colorado constitution because it simply maintains the status quo.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-104, amend
(3)(o) as follows:
39-22-104. Income tax imposed on individuals, estates, and
trusts - single rate - report - tax preference performance statement -
legislative declaration - definitions - repeal. (3) There shall be added to
the federal taxable income:
(o) For income tax years commencing on or after January 1, 2021,
but before January 1, 2026, an amount equal to the deduction allowed under
section 199A of the internal revenue code for a taxpayer who files a single
return and whose adjusted gross income is greater than five hundred
thousand dollars, and for taxpayers who file a joint return and whose
adjusted gross income is greater than one million dollars; except that this
subsection (3)(o) does not apply to a taxpayer who is required to file a
schedule F, profit or loss from farming, or successor form, as an attachment
to a federal income tax return for the tax year in which the taxpayer claims
the deduction allowed under section 199A of the internal revenue code.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 25B-1001

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Connor Randall Esther van Mourik
ACTING CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 25B-1001